Illinois, session 104th, SB2151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1022 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1022)7    Sec. 5-1022. Competitive bids. 8    (a) Any purchase by a county with fewer than 2,000,000 9inhabitants, or an elected official in a county with fewer 10than 2,000,000 inhabitants, including an elected official with 11control of the internal operations of the office, of services, 12materials, equipment, or supplies in excess of $30,000, other 13than professional services, shall be contracted for in one of 14the following ways:15        (1) by a contract let to the lowest responsible bidder 16    after advertising for bids in a newspaper published within 17    the county or, if no newspaper is published within the 18    county, then a newspaper having general circulation within 19    the county;20        (2) by a contract let without advertising for bids in 21    the case of an emergency if authorized by the county 22    board; or23        (3) by a contract let without advertising for bids in   SB2151- 2 -LRB104 10834 RTM 20915 b1    the case of the expedited replacement of a disabled, 2    inoperable, or damaged patrol vehicle of the sheriff's 3    department if authorized by the county board. 4    (b) In determining the lowest responsible bidder, the 5county board or elected official shall take into consideration 6the qualities of the articles supplied; their conformity with 7the specifications; their suitability to the requirements of 8the county; the availability of support services; the 9uniqueness of the service, materials, equipment, or supplies 10as it applies to networked, integrated computer systems; the 11compatibility to existing equipment; and the delivery terms. 12In addition, the county board or elected official may take 13into consideration the bidder's active participation in an 14applicable apprenticeship program registered with the United 15States Department of Labor. The county board also may take 16into consideration whether a bidder is a private enterprise or 17a State-controlled enterprise and, notwithstanding any other 18provision of this Section or a lower bid by a State-controlled 19enterprise, may let a contract to the lowest responsible 20bidder that is a private enterprise.21    (c) This Section does not apply to contracts by a county or 22elected official with the federal government or to purchases 23of used equipment, purchases at auction or similar 24transactions which by their very nature are not suitable to 25competitive bids, pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the 26county board.  SB2151- 3 -LRB104 10834 RTM 20915 b1    (c-5) This Section does not apply to contracts by an 2elected official with the federal government or to purchases 3of used equipment, purchases at auction or similar 4transactions which by their very nature are not suitable to 5competitive bids. 6    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, a 7county or elected official may let without advertising for 8bids in the case of purchases and contracts, when individual 9orders do not exceed $35,000, for the use, purchase, delivery, 10movement, or installation of data processing equipment, 11software, or services and telecommunications and inter-connect 12equipment, software, and services.13    (e) A county or elected official may require, as a 14condition of any contract for goods and services, that persons 15awarded a contract with the county or elected official and all 16affiliates of the person collect and remit Illinois Use Tax on 17all sales of tangible personal property into the State of 18Illinois in accordance with the provisions of the Illinois Use 19Tax Act regardless of whether the person or affiliate is a 20"retailer maintaining a place of business within this State" 21as defined in Section 2 of the Use Tax Act. For purposes of 22this subsection (e), the term "affiliate" means any entity 23that (1) directly, indirectly, or constructively controls 24another entity, (2) is directly, indirectly, or constructively 25controlled by another entity, or (3) is subject to the control 26of a common entity. For purposes of this subsection (e), an   SB2151- 4 -LRB104 10834 RTM 20915 b1entity controls another entity if it owns, directly or 2individually, more than 10% of the voting securities of that 3entity. As used in this subsection (e), the term "voting 4security" means a security that (1) confers upon the holder 5the right to vote for the election of members of the board of 6directors or similar governing body of the business or (2) is 7convertible into, or entitles the holder to receive upon its 8exercise, a security that confers such a right to vote. A 9general partnership interest is a voting security.10    (f) Bids submitted to, and contracts executed by, the 11county or elected official may require a certification by the 12bidder or contractor that the bidder or contractor is not 13barred from bidding for or entering into a contract under this 14Section and that the bidder or contractor acknowledges that 15the county may declare the contract void if the certification 16completed pursuant to this subsection (f) is false.17    (g) The State's Attorney in each county shall be exempt 18from letting contracts by competitive bid for services related 19to both criminal and civil litigation. 20(Source: P.A. 103-14, eff. 1-1-24; 103-286, eff. 7-28-23; 21103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.)